Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-3719
Director; duties;
rules and regulations.

The director shall administer
and enforce the provisions of sections 44-3701 to 44-3721 and may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with sections 44-3701 to 44-3721.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB700, § 16.